Illinois, session 104th, SB2254.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 11-9.3 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/11-9.3)7    Sec. 11-9.3. Presence within school zone by child sex 8offenders prohibited; approaching, contacting, residing with, 9or communicating with a child within certain places by child 10sex offenders prohibited.11    (a) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly be 12present in any school building, on real property comprising 13any school, or in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted 14by a school to transport students to or from school or a school 15related activity when persons under the age of 18 are present 16in the building, on the grounds or in the conveyance, unless 17the offender is a parent or guardian of a student attending the 18school and the parent or guardian is: (i) attending a 19conference at the school with school personnel to discuss the 20progress of his or her child academically or socially, (ii) 21participating in child review conferences in which evaluation 22and placement decisions may be made with respect to his or her 23child regarding special education services, or (iii) attending   SB2254- 2 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1conferences to discuss other student issues concerning his or 2her child such as retention and promotion and notifies the 3principal of the school of his or her presence at the school or 4unless the offender has permission to be present from the 5superintendent or the school board or in the case of a private 6school from the principal. In the case of a public school, if 7permission is granted, the superintendent or school board 8president must inform the principal of the school where the 9sex offender will be present. Notification includes the nature 10of the sex offender's visit and the hours in which the sex 11offender will be present in the school. The sex offender is 12responsible for notifying the principal's office when he or 13she arrives on school property and when he or she departs from 14school property. If the sex offender is to be present in the 15vicinity of children, the sex offender has the duty to remain 16under the direct supervision of a school official.17    (a-5) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 18be present within 100 feet of a site posted as a pick-up or 19discharge stop for a conveyance owned, leased, or contracted 20by a school to transport students to or from school or a school 21related activity when one or more persons under the age of 18 22are present at the site. 23    (a-10) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 24knowingly be present in any public park building, a playground 25or recreation area within any publicly accessible privately 26owned building, or on real property comprising any public park   SB2254- 3 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1when persons under the age of 18 are present in the building or 2on the grounds and to approach, contact, or communicate with a 3child under 18 years of age, unless the offender is a parent or 4guardian of a person under 18 years of age present in the 5building or on the grounds. 6    (b) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 7loiter within 500 feet of a school building or real property 8comprising any school while persons under the age of 18 are 9present in the building or on the grounds, unless the offender 10is a parent or guardian of a student attending the school and 11the parent or guardian is: (i) attending a conference at the 12school with school personnel to discuss the progress of his or 13her child academically or socially, (ii) participating in 14child review conferences in which evaluation and placement 15decisions may be made with respect to his or her child 16regarding special education services, or (iii) attending 17conferences to discuss other student issues concerning his or 18her child such as retention and promotion and notifies the 19principal of the school of his or her presence at the school or 20has permission to be present from the superintendent or the 21school board or in the case of a private school from the 22principal. In the case of a public school, if permission is 23granted, the superintendent or school board president must 24inform the principal of the school where the sex offender will 25be present. Notification includes the nature of the sex 26offender's visit and the hours in which the sex offender will   SB2254- 4 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1be present in the school. The sex offender is responsible for 2notifying the principal's office when he or she arrives on 3school property and when he or she departs from school 4property. If the sex offender is to be present in the vicinity 5of children, the sex offender has the duty to remain under the 6direct supervision of a school official.7    (b-2) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 8loiter on a public way within 500 feet of a public park 9building or real property comprising any public park while 10persons under the age of 18 are present in the building or on 11the grounds and to approach, contact, or communicate with a 12child under 18 years of age, unless the offender is a parent or 13guardian of a person under 18 years of age present in the 14building or on the grounds. 15    (b-5) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 16reside within 250 500 feet of a school building or the real 17property comprising any school that persons under the age of 1818 attend. Nothing in this subsection (b-5) prohibits a child 19sex offender from residing within 500 feet of a school 20building or the real property comprising any school that 21persons under 18 attend if the property is owned by the child 22sex offender and was purchased before July 7, 2000 (the 23effective date of Public Act 91-911). Nothing in this 24subsection (b-5) prohibits a person subject to this subsection 25(b-5) from residing within 250 feet of a school building or the 26real property comprising any school that persons under 18   SB2254- 5 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1attend if the property was already established as his or her 2current address of registration prior to the date that the 3school opened, or if required to obtain a license prior to 4opening, was issued a license to open. Once a current property 5is established as the site of registration, nothing in this 6subsection (b-5) prohibits a person subject to this subsection 7(b-5) from continuing to reside at the property if the 8person's floor or unit number changes.9    (b-10) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 10knowingly reside within 250 500 feet of a playground, child 11care institution, day care center, part day child care 12facility, day care home, group day care home, or a facility 13providing programs or services exclusively directed toward 14persons under 18 years of age. Nothing in this subsection 15(b-10) prohibits a child sex offender from residing within 500 16feet of a playground or a facility providing programs or 17services exclusively directed toward persons under 18 years of 18age if the property is owned by the child sex offender and was 19purchased before July 7, 2000. Nothing in this subsection 20(b-10) prohibits a child sex offender from residing within 500 21feet of a child care institution, day care center, or part day 22child care facility if the property is owned by the child sex 23offender and was purchased before June 26, 2006. Nothing in 24this subsection (b-10) prohibits a child sex offender from 25residing within 500 feet of a day care home or group day care 26home if the property is owned by the child sex offender and was   SB2254- 6 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1purchased before August 14, 2008 (the effective date of Public 2Act 95-821). Nothing in this subsection (b-10) prohibits a 3person subject to this subsection (b-10) from residing within 4250 feet of a playground, child care institution, day care 5center, part day care child care facility, or a facility 6providing programs or services exclusively directed toward 7person under 18 years of age if the property was established as 8his or her current address of registration prior to the date 9that entity was opened, or if the entity must obtain a license 10in order to provide programs or services, the date that the 11license was issued. Once a current property is established as 12the site of registration, nothing in this subsection (b-10) 13prohibits a person subject to this subsection (b-10) from 14continuing to reside at the property if the person's floor or 15unit number changes.16    (b-15) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 17knowingly reside within 500 feet of the victim of the sex 18offense. Nothing in this subsection (b-15) prohibits a child 19sex offender from residing within 500 feet of the victim if the 20property in which the child sex offender resides is owned by 21the child sex offender and was purchased before August 22, 222002. 23    This subsection (b-15) does not apply if the victim of the 24sex offense is 21 years of age or older. 25    (b-20) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 26knowingly communicate, other than for a lawful purpose under   SB2254- 7 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1Illinois law, using the Internet or any other digital media, 2with a person under 18 years of age or with a person whom he or 3she believes to be a person under 18 years of age, unless the 4offender is a parent or guardian of the person under 18 years 5of age. 6    (c) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 7operate, manage, be employed by, volunteer at, be associated 8with, or knowingly be present at any: (i) facility providing 9programs or services exclusively directed toward persons under 10the age of 18; (ii) day care center; (iii) part day child care 11facility; (iv) child care institution; (v) school providing 12before and after school programs for children under 18 years 13of age; (vi) day care home; or (vii) group day care home. This 14does not prohibit a child sex offender from owning the real 15property upon which the programs or services are offered or 16upon which the day care center, part day child care facility, 17child care institution, or school providing before and after 18school programs for children under 18 years of age is located, 19provided the child sex offender refrains from being present on 20the premises for the hours during which: (1) the programs or 21services are being offered or (2) the day care center, part day 22child care facility, child care institution, or school 23providing before and after school programs for children under 2418 years of age, day care home, or group day care home is 25operated. 26    (c-2) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to   SB2254- 8 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1participate in a holiday event involving children under 18 2years of age, including but not limited to distributing candy 3or other items to children on Halloween, wearing a Santa Claus 4costume on or preceding Christmas, being employed as a 5department store Santa Claus, or wearing an Easter Bunny 6costume on or preceding Easter. For the purposes of this 7subsection, child sex offender has the meaning as defined in 8this Section, but does not include as a sex offense under 9paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of this Section, the offense 10under subsection (c) of Section 11-1.50 of this Code. This 11subsection does not apply to a child sex offender who is a 12parent or guardian of children under 18 years of age that are 13present in the home and other non-familial minors are not 14present.15    (c-5) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 16operate, manage, be employed by, or be associated with any 17carnival, amusement enterprise, or county or State fair when 18persons under the age of 18 are present. 19    (c-6) It is unlawful for a child sex offender who owns and 20resides at residential real estate to knowingly rent any 21residential unit within the same building in which he or she 22resides to a person who is the parent or guardian of a child or 23children under 18 years of age. This subsection shall apply 24only to leases or other rental arrangements entered into after 25January 1, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 95-820).26    (c-7) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly   SB2254- 9 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1offer or provide any programs or services to persons under 18 2years of age in his or her residence or the residence of 3another or in any facility for the purpose of offering or 4providing such programs or services, whether such programs or 5services are offered or provided by contract, agreement, 6arrangement, or on a volunteer basis.7    (c-8) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 8operate, whether authorized to do so or not, any of the 9following vehicles: (1) a vehicle which is specifically 10designed, constructed or modified and equipped to be used for 11the retail sale of food or beverages, including but not 12limited to an ice cream truck; (2) an authorized emergency 13vehicle; or (3) a rescue vehicle. 14    (d) Definitions. In this Section:15        (1) "Child sex offender" means any person who:16            (i) has been charged under Illinois law, or any 17        substantially similar federal law or law of another 18        state, with a sex offense set forth in paragraph (2) of 19        this subsection (d) or the attempt to commit an 20        included sex offense, and the victim is a person under 21        18 years of age at the time of the offense; and:22                (A) is convicted of such offense or an attempt 23            to commit such offense; or24                (B) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 25            of such offense or an attempt to commit such 26            offense; or  SB2254- 10 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1                (C) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 2            pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 104-25 of 3            the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 of such 4            offense or an attempt to commit such offense; or5                (D) is the subject of a finding not resulting 6            in an acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to 7            subsection (a) of Section 104-25 of the Code of 8            Criminal Procedure of 1963 for the alleged 9            commission or attempted commission of such 10            offense; or11                (E) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 12            following a hearing conducted pursuant to a 13            federal law or the law of another state 14            substantially similar to subsection (c) of Section 15            104-25 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 16            of such offense or of the attempted commission of 17            such offense; or18                (F) is the subject of a finding not resulting 19            in an acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to 20            a federal law or the law of another state 21            substantially similar to subsection (a) of Section 22            104-25 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 23            for the alleged violation or attempted commission 24            of such offense; or25            (ii) is certified as a sexually dangerous person 26        pursuant to the Illinois Sexually Dangerous Persons   SB2254- 11 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1        Act, or any substantially similar federal law or the 2        law of another state, when any conduct giving rise to 3        such certification is committed or attempted against a 4        person less than 18 years of age; or5            (iii) is subject to the provisions of Section 2 of 6        the Interstate Agreements on Sexually Dangerous 7        Persons Act.8        Convictions that result from or are connected with the 9    same act, or result from offenses committed at the same 10    time, shall be counted for the purpose of this Section as 11    one conviction. Any conviction set aside pursuant to law 12    is not a conviction for purposes of this Section.13        (2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2.5), 14    "sex offense" means:15            (i) A violation of any of the following Sections 16        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 17        2012: 10-4 (forcible detention), 10-7 (aiding or 18        abetting child abduction under Section 10-5(b)(10)), 19        10-5(b)(10) (child luring), 11-1.40 (predatory 20        criminal sexual assault of a child), 11-6 (indecent 21        solicitation of a child), 11-6.5 (indecent 22        solicitation of an adult), 11-9.1 (sexual exploitation 23        of a child), 11-9.2 (custodial sexual misconduct), 24        11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person with a 25        disability), 11-11 (sexual relations within families), 26        11-14.3(a)(1) (promoting prostitution by advancing   SB2254- 12 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1        prostitution), 11-14.3(a)(2)(A) (promoting 2        prostitution by profiting from prostitution by 3        compelling a person to be a prostitute), 4        11-14.3(a)(2)(C) (promoting prostitution by profiting 5        from prostitution by means other than as described in 6        subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of 7        subsection (a) of Section 11-14.3), 11-14.4 (promoting 8        juvenile prostitution), 11-18.1 (patronizing a 9        juvenile prostitute), 11-20.1 (child pornography), 10        11-20.1B (aggravated child pornography), 11-21 11        (harmful material), 11-25 (grooming), 11-26 (traveling 12        to meet a minor or traveling to meet a child), 12-33 13        (ritualized abuse of a child), 11-20 (obscenity) (when 14        that offense was committed in any school, on real 15        property comprising any school, in any conveyance 16        owned, leased, or contracted by a school to transport 17        students to or from school or a school related 18        activity, or in a public park), 11-30 (public 19        indecency) (when committed in a school, on real 20        property comprising a school, in any conveyance owned, 21        leased, or contracted by a school to transport 22        students to or from school or a school related 23        activity, or in a public park). An attempt to commit 24        any of these offenses.25            (ii) A violation of any of the following Sections 26        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of   SB2254- 13 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of 2        age: 11-1.20 (criminal sexual assault), 11-1.30 3        (aggravated criminal sexual assault), 11-1.50 4        (criminal sexual abuse), 11-1.60 (aggravated criminal 5        sexual abuse). An attempt to commit any of these 6        offenses.7            (iii) A violation of any of the following Sections 8        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 9        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of age 10        and the defendant is not a parent of the victim:11            10-1 (kidnapping),12            10-2 (aggravated kidnapping),13            10-3 (unlawful restraint),14            10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint),15            11-9.1(A) (permitting sexual abuse of a child). 16            An attempt to commit any of these offenses.17            (iv) A violation of any former law of this State 18        substantially equivalent to any offense listed in 19        clause (2)(i) or (2)(ii) of subsection (d) of this 20        Section.21        (2.5) For the purposes of subsections (b-5) and (b-10) 22    only, a sex offense means:23            (i) A violation of any of the following Sections 24        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 25        2012:26             10-5(b)(10) (child luring), 10-7 (aiding or   SB2254- 14 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1        abetting child abduction under Section 10-5(b)(10)), 2        11-1.40 (predatory criminal sexual assault of a 3        child), 11-6 (indecent solicitation of a child), 4        11-6.5 (indecent solicitation of an adult), 11-9.2 5        (custodial sexual misconduct), 11-9.5 (sexual 6        misconduct with a person with a disability), 11-11 7        (sexual relations within families), 11-14.3(a)(1) 8        (promoting prostitution by advancing prostitution), 9        11-14.3(a)(2)(A) (promoting prostitution by profiting 10        from prostitution by compelling a person to be a 11        prostitute), 11-14.3(a)(2)(C) (promoting prostitution 12        by profiting from prostitution by means other than as 13        described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph 14        (2) of subsection (a) of Section 11-14.3), 11-14.4 15        (promoting juvenile prostitution), 11-18.1 16        (patronizing a juvenile prostitute), 11-20.1 (child 17        pornography), 11-20.1B (aggravated child pornography), 18        11-25 (grooming), 11-26 (traveling to meet a minor or 19        traveling to meet a child), or 12-33 (ritualized abuse 20        of a child). An attempt to commit any of these 21        offenses.22            (ii) A violation of any of the following Sections 23        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 24        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of 25        age: 11-1.20 (criminal sexual assault), 11-1.30 26        (aggravated criminal sexual assault), 11-1.60   SB2254- 15 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1        (aggravated criminal sexual abuse), and subsection (a) 2        of Section 11-1.50 (criminal sexual abuse). An attempt 3        to commit any of these offenses.4            (iii) A violation of any of the following Sections 5        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 6        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of age 7        and the defendant is not a parent of the victim:8            10-1 (kidnapping),9            10-2 (aggravated kidnapping),10            10-3 (unlawful restraint),11            10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint),12            11-9.1(A) (permitting sexual abuse of a child). 13            An attempt to commit any of these offenses.14            (iv) A violation of any former law of this State 15        substantially equivalent to any offense listed in this 16        paragraph (2.5) of this subsection.17        (3) A conviction for an offense of federal law or the 18    law of another state that is substantially equivalent to 19    any offense listed in paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of 20    this Section shall constitute a conviction for the purpose 21    of this Section. A finding or adjudication as a sexually 22    dangerous person under any federal law or law of another 23    state that is substantially equivalent to the Sexually 24    Dangerous Persons Act shall constitute an adjudication for 25    the purposes of this Section.26        (4) "Authorized emergency vehicle", "rescue vehicle",   SB2254- 16 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1    and "vehicle" have the meanings ascribed to them in 2    Sections 1-105, 1-171.8 and 1-217, respectively, of the 3    Illinois Vehicle Code. 4        (5) "Child care institution" has the meaning ascribed 5    to it in Section 2.06 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 6        (6) "Day care center" has the meaning ascribed to it 7    in Section 2.09 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 8        (7) "Day care home" has the meaning ascribed to it in 9    Section 2.18 of the Child Care Act of 1969.10        (8) "Facility providing programs or services directed 11    towards persons under the age of 18" means any facility 12    providing programs or services exclusively directed 13    towards persons under the age of 18.14        (9) "Group day care home" has the meaning ascribed to 15    it in Section 2.20 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 16        (10) "Internet" has the meaning set forth in Section 17    16-0.1 of this Code. 18        (11) "Loiter" means:19            (i) Standing, sitting idly, whether or not the 20        person is in a vehicle, or remaining in or around 21        school or public park property.22            (ii) Standing, sitting idly, whether or not the 23        person is in a vehicle, or remaining in or around 24        school or public park property, for the purpose of 25        committing or attempting to commit a sex offense.26            (iii) Entering or remaining in a building in or   SB2254- 17 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1        around school property, other than the offender's 2        residence.3        (12) "Part day child care facility" has the meaning 4    ascribed to it in Section 2.10 of the Child Care Act of 5    1969. 6        (13) "Playground" means a piece of land owned or 7    controlled by a unit of local government that is 8    designated by the unit of local government for use solely 9    or primarily for children's recreation. 10        (14) "Public park" includes a park, forest preserve, 11    bikeway, trail, or conservation area under the 12    jurisdiction of the State or a unit of local government. 13        (15) "School" means a public or private preschool or 14    elementary or secondary school. 15        (16) "School official" means the principal, a teacher, 16    or any other certified employee of the school, the 17    superintendent of schools or a member of the school board.18    (e) For the purposes of this Section, the 500 feet 19distance shall be measured from: (1) the edge of the property 20of the school building or the real property comprising the 21school that is closest to the edge of the property of the child 22sex offender's residence or where he or she is loitering, and 23(2) the edge of the property comprising the public park 24building or the real property comprising the public park, 25playground, child care institution, day care center, part day 26child care facility, or facility providing programs or   SB2254- 18 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1services exclusively directed toward persons under 18 years of 2age, or a victim of the sex offense who is under 21 years of 3age, to the edge of the child sex offender's place of residence 4or place where he or she is loitering. 5    (f) Sentence. A person who violates this Section is guilty 6of a Class 4 felony.7(Source: P.A. 102-997, eff. 1-1-23.) 8    Section 10. The Sex Offender Registration Act is amended 9by changing Sections 3, 6, and 8 as follows: 10    (730 ILCS 150/3)11    Sec. 3. Duty to register. 12    (a) A sex offender, as defined in Section 2 of this Act, or 13sexual predator shall, within the time period prescribed in 14subsections (b) and (c), register in person and provide 15accurate information as required by the Illinois State Police. 16Such information shall include a current photograph, current 17address, current place of employment, the sex offender's or 18sexual predator's telephone number, including cellular 19telephone number, the employer's telephone number, school 20attended, all e-mail addresses, instant messaging identities, 21chat room identities, and other Internet communications 22identities that the sex offender uses or plans to use, all 23Uniform Resource Locators (URLs) registered or used by the sex 24offender, all blogs and other Internet sites maintained by the   SB2254- 19 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1sex offender or to which the sex offender has uploaded any 2content or posted any messages or information, extensions of 3the time period for registering as provided in this Article 4and, if an extension was granted, the reason why the extension 5was granted and the date the sex offender was notified of the 6extension. The information shall also include a copy of the 7terms and conditions of parole or release signed by the sex 8offender and given to the sex offender by his or her 9supervising officer or aftercare specialist, the county of 10conviction, license plate numbers for every vehicle registered 11in the name of the sex offender, the age of the sex offender at 12the time of the commission of the offense, the age of the 13victim at the time of the commission of the offense, and any 14distinguishing marks located on the body of the sex offender. 15A sex offender convicted under Section 11-6, 11-20.1, 1611-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-21 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 17Criminal Code of 2012 shall provide all Internet protocol (IP) 18addresses in his or her residence, registered in his or her 19name, accessible at his or her place of employment, or 20otherwise under his or her control or custody. If the sex 21offender is a child sex offender as defined in Section 11-9.3 22or 11-9.4 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 232012, the sex offender shall report to the registering agency 24whether he or she is living in a household with a child under 2518 years of age who is not his or her own child, provided that 26his or her own child is not the victim of the sex offense. The   SB2254- 20 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1sex offender or sexual predator shall register: 2        (1) with the chief of police in the municipality in 3    which he or she resides or is temporarily domiciled for a 4    period of time of 3 or more days, unless the municipality 5    is the City of Chicago, in which case he or she shall 6    register at a fixed location designated by the 7    Superintendent of the Chicago Police Department; or 8        (2) with the sheriff in the county in which he or she 9    resides or is temporarily domiciled for a period of time 10    of 3 or more days in an unincorporated area or, if 11    incorporated, no police chief exists. 12    If the sex offender or sexual predator is employed at or 13attends an institution of higher education, he or she shall 14also register: 15        (i) with: 16            (A) the chief of police in the municipality in 17        which he or she is employed at or attends an 18        institution of higher education, unless the 19        municipality is the City of Chicago, in which case he 20        or she shall register at a fixed location designated 21        by the Superintendent of the Chicago Police 22        Department; or23            (B) the sheriff in the county in which he or she is 24        employed or attends an institution of higher education 25        located in an unincorporated area, or if incorporated, 26        no police chief exists; and   SB2254- 21 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1        (ii) with the public safety or security director of 2    the institution of higher education which he or she is 3    employed at or attends. 4    The registration fees shall only apply to the municipality 5or county of primary registration, and not to campus 6registration. 7    For purposes of this Article, the place of residence or 8temporary domicile is defined as any and all places where the 9sex offender resides for an aggregate period of time of 3 or 10more days during any calendar year. Any person required to 11register under this Article who lacks a fixed address or 12temporary domicile must notify, in person, the agency of 13jurisdiction of his or her last known address within 3 days 14after ceasing to have a fixed residence.15    A sex offender or sexual predator who is temporarily 16absent from his or her current address of registration for 3 or 17more days shall notify the law enforcement agency having 18jurisdiction of his or her current registration, including the 19itinerary for travel, in the manner provided in Section 6 of 20this Act for notification to the law enforcement agency having 21jurisdiction of change of address. 22    Any person who lacks a fixed residence must report weekly, 23in person, with the sheriff's office of the county in which he 24or she is located in an unincorporated area, or with the chief 25of police in the municipality in which he or she is located. 26Any person who lacks a fixed residence shall report in person   SB2254- 22 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1every 90 days or annually, as provided in Section 6 of this 2Act, and additionally must follow the interim reporting 3requirements in the applicable Sections of this Act. The 4agency of jurisdiction will document each weekly registration 5to include all the locations where the person has stayed 6during the past 7 days. 7    The sex offender or sexual predator shall provide accurate 8information as required by the Illinois State Police. That 9information shall include the sex offender's or sexual 10predator's current place of employment. 11    (a-5) An out-of-state student or out-of-state employee 12shall, within 3 days after beginning school or employment in 13this State, register in person and provide accurate 14information as required by the Illinois State Police. Such 15information will include current place of employment, school 16attended, and address in state of residence. A sex offender 17convicted under Section 11-6, 11-20.1, 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 1811-21 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 19shall provide all Internet protocol (IP) addresses in his or 20her residence, registered in his or her name, accessible at 21his or her place of employment, or otherwise under his or her 22control or custody. The out-of-state student or out-of-state 23employee shall register: 24        (1) with:25            (A) the chief of police in the municipality in 26        which he or she attends school or is employed for a   SB2254- 23 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1        period of time of 5 or more days or for an aggregate 2        period of time of more than 30 days during any calendar 3        year, unless the municipality is the City of Chicago, 4        in which case he or she shall register at a fixed 5        location designated by the Superintendent of the 6        Chicago Police Department; or 7            (B) the sheriff in the county in which he or she 8        attends school or is employed for a period of time of 5 9        or more days or for an aggregate period of time of more 10        than 30 days during any calendar year in an 11        unincorporated area or, if incorporated, no police 12        chief exists; and13        (2) with the public safety or security director of the 14    institution of higher education he or she is employed at 15    or attends for a period of time of 5 or more days or for an 16    aggregate period of time of more than 30 days during a 17    calendar year.18    The registration fees shall only apply to the municipality 19or county of primary registration, and not to campus 20registration.21    The out-of-state student or out-of-state employee shall 22provide accurate information as required by the Illinois State 23Police. That information shall include the out-of-state 24student's current place of school attendance or the 25out-of-state employee's current place of employment. 26    (a-10) Any law enforcement agency registering sex   SB2254- 24 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1offenders or sexual predators in accordance with subsections 2(a) or (a-5) of this Section shall forward to the Attorney 3General a copy of sex offender registration forms from persons 4convicted under Section 11-6, 11-20.1, 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 511-21 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 62012, including periodic and annual registrations under 7Section 6 of this Act.8    (b) Any sex offender, as defined in Section 2 of this Act, 9or sexual predator, regardless of any initial, prior, or other 10registration, shall, within 3 days of beginning school, or 11establishing a residence, place of employment, or temporary 12domicile in any county, register in person as set forth in 13subsection (a) or (a-5). 14    (c) The registration for any person required to register 15under this Article shall be as follows: 16        (1) Any person registered under the Habitual Child Sex 17    Offender Registration Act or the Child Sex Offender 18    Registration Act prior to January 1, 1996, shall be deemed 19    initially registered as of January 1, 1996; however, this 20    shall not be construed to extend the duration of 21    registration set forth in Section 7. 22        (2) Except as provided in subsection (c)(2.1) or 23    (c)(4), any person convicted or adjudicated prior to 24    January 1, 1996, whose liability for registration under 25    Section 7 has not expired, shall register in person prior 26    to January 31, 1996.   SB2254- 25 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1        (2.1) A sex offender or sexual predator, who has never 2    previously been required to register under this Act, has a 3    duty to register if the person has been convicted of any 4    felony offense after July 1, 2011. A person who previously 5    was required to register under this Act for a period of 10 6    years and successfully completed that registration period 7    has a duty to register if: (i) the person has been 8    convicted of any felony offense after July 1, 2011, and 9    (ii) the offense for which the 10 year registration was 10    served currently requires a registration period of more 11    than 10 years. Notification of an offender's duty to 12    register under this subsection shall be pursuant to 13    Section 5-7 of this Act. 14        (2.5) Except as provided in subsection (c)(4), any 15    person who has not been notified of his or her 16    responsibility to register shall be notified by a criminal 17    justice entity of his or her responsibility to register. 18    Upon notification the person must then register within 3 19    days of notification of his or her requirement to 20    register. Except as provided in subsection (c)(2.1), if 21    notification is not made within the offender's 10 year 22    registration requirement, and the Illinois State Police 23    determines no evidence exists or indicates the offender 24    attempted to avoid registration, the offender will no 25    longer be required to register under this Act. 26        (3) Except as provided in subsection (c)(4), any   SB2254- 26 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1    person convicted on or after January 1, 1996, shall 2    register in person within 3 days after the entry of the 3    sentencing order based upon his or her conviction. 4        (4) Any person unable to comply with the registration 5    requirements of this Article because he or she is 6    confined, institutionalized, or imprisoned in Illinois on 7    or after January 1, 1996, shall register in person within 8    3 days of discharge, parole or release. 9        (5) The person shall provide positive identification 10    and documentation that substantiates proof of residence at 11    the registering address. 12        (6) The person shall pay a $100 initial registration 13    fee and a $100 annual renewal fee to the registering law 14    enforcement agency having jurisdiction. The registering 15    agency may waive the registration fee if it determines 16    that the person is indigent and unable to pay the 17    registration fee. Thirty-five dollars for the initial 18    registration fee and $35 of the annual renewal fee shall 19    be retained and used by the registering agency for 20    official purposes. Having retained $35 of the initial 21    registration fee and $35 of the annual renewal fee, the 22    registering agency shall remit the remainder of the fee to 23    State agencies within 30 days of receipt for deposit into 24    the State funds as follows:25            (A) Five dollars of the initial registration fee 26        and $5 of the annual fee shall be remitted to the State   SB2254- 27 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1        Treasurer who shall deposit the moneys into the Sex 2        Offender Management Board Fund under Section 19 of the 3        Sex Offender Management Board Act. Money deposited 4        into the Sex Offender Management Board Fund shall be 5        administered by the Sex Offender Management Board and 6        shall be used by the Board to comply with the 7        provisions of the Sex Offender Management Board Act.8            (B) Thirty dollars of the initial registration fee 9        and $30 of the annual renewal fee shall be remitted to 10        the Illinois State Police which shall deposit the 11        moneys into the Offender Registration Fund. 12            (C) Thirty dollars of the initial registration fee 13        and $30 of the annual renewal fee shall be remitted to 14        the Attorney General who shall deposit the moneys into 15        the Attorney General Sex Offender Awareness, Training, 16        and Education Fund. Moneys deposited into the Fund 17        shall be used by the Attorney General to administer 18        the I-SORT program and to alert and educate the 19        public, victims, and witnesses of their rights under 20        various victim notification laws and for training law 21        enforcement agencies, State's Attorneys, and medical 22        providers of their legal duties concerning the 23        prosecution and investigation of sex offenses. 24        The registering agency shall establish procedures to 25    document the receipt and remittance of the $100 initial 26    registration fee and $100 annual renewal fee.   SB2254- 28 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1    (d) Within 3 days after obtaining or changing employment 2and, if employed on January 1, 2000, within 5 days after that 3date, a person required to register under this Section must 4report, in person to the law enforcement agency having 5jurisdiction, the business name and address where he or she is 6employed. If the person has multiple businesses or work 7locations, every business and work location must be reported 8to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction. 9(Source: P.A. 101-571, eff. 8-23-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 10    (730 ILCS 150/6)11    Sec. 6. Duty to report; change of address, school, name, 12or employment; duty to inform. A person who has been 13adjudicated to be sexually dangerous or is a sexually violent 14person and is later released, or found to be no longer sexually 15dangerous or no longer a sexually violent person and 16discharged, or convicted of a violation of this Act after July 171, 2005, shall report in person to the law enforcement agency 18with whom he or she last registered no later than 90 days after 19the date of his or her last registration and every 90 days 20thereafter and at such other times at the request of the law 21enforcement agency not to exceed 4 times a year. Such sexually 22dangerous or sexually violent person must report all new or 23changed e-mail addresses, all new or changed instant messaging 24identities, all new or changed chat room identities, and all 25other new or changed Internet communications identities that   SB2254- 29 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1the sexually dangerous or sexually violent person uses or 2plans to use, all new or changed Uniform Resource Locators 3(URLs) registered or used by the sexually dangerous or 4sexually violent person, and all new or changed blogs and 5other Internet sites maintained by the sexually dangerous or 6sexually violent person or to which the sexually dangerous or 7sexually violent person has uploaded any content or posted any 8messages or information. Any person who lacks a fixed 9residence shall report in person to the appropriate law 10enforcement agency where the person is located every 90 days 11or annually, as provided in this Section, and additionally 12must follow the interim reporting requirements in the 13applicable Sections of this Act. Any person who lacks a fixed 14residence must report weekly, in person, to the appropriate 15law enforcement agency where the sex offender is located. Any 16other person who is required to register under this Article 17shall report in person to the appropriate law enforcement 18agency with whom he or she last registered within one year from 19the date of last registration and every year thereafter and at 20such other times at the request of the law enforcement agency 21not to exceed 4 times a year. If any person required to 22register under this Article lacks a fixed residence or 23temporary domicile, he or she must notify, in person, the 24agency of jurisdiction of his or her last known address within 253 days after ceasing to have a fixed residence and if the 26offender leaves the last jurisdiction of residence, he or she,   SB2254- 30 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1must within 3 days after leaving register in person with the 2new agency of jurisdiction. If any other person required to 3register under this Article changes his or her residence 4address, place of employment, telephone number, cellular 5telephone number, or school, he or she shall report in person, 6to the law enforcement agency with whom he or she last 7registered, his or her new address, change in employment, 8telephone number, cellular telephone number, or school, all 9new or changed e-mail addresses, all new or changed instant 10messaging identities, all new or changed chat room identities, 11and all other new or changed Internet communications 12identities that the sex offender uses or plans to use, all new 13or changed Uniform Resource Locators (URLs) registered or used 14by the sex offender, and all new or changed blogs and other 15Internet sites maintained by the sex offender or to which the 16sex offender has uploaded any content or posted any messages 17or information, and register, in person, with the appropriate 18law enforcement agency within the time period specified in 19Section 3. If any person required to register under this 20Article is granted a legal name change pursuant to subsection 21(b) of Section 21-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the 22person shall report, in person, within 3 days of the legal name 23change, to the law enforcement agency with whom the person 24last registered. If the sex offender is a child sex offender as 25defined in Section 11-9.3 or 11-9.4 of the Criminal Code of 261961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, the sex offender shall   SB2254- 31 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1within 3 days after beginning to reside in a household with a 2child under 18 years of age who is not his or her own child, 3provided that his or her own child is not the victim of the sex 4offense, report that information to the registering law 5enforcement agency. The law enforcement agency shall, within 3 6days of the reporting in person by the person required to 7register under this Article, notify the Illinois State Police 8of the new place of residence, change in employment, telephone 9number, cellular telephone number, or school.10    If any person required to register under this Article 11intends to establish a residence or employment outside of the 12State of Illinois, at least 10 days before establishing that 13residence or employment, he or she shall report in person to 14the law enforcement agency with which he or she last 15registered of his or her out-of-state intended residence or 16employment. The law enforcement agency with which such person 17last registered shall, within 3 days after the reporting in 18person of the person required to register under this Article 19of an address or employment change, notify the Illinois State 20Police. The Illinois State Police shall forward such 21information to the out-of-state law enforcement agency having 22jurisdiction in the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois 23State Police.24(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1133, eff. 1-1-24; 25103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)   SB2254- 32 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1    (730 ILCS 150/8)  (from Ch. 38, par. 228)2    Sec. 8. Registration and DNA submission requirements. 3    (a) Registration. Registration as required by this Article 4shall consist of a statement in writing signed by the person 5giving the information that is required by the Illinois State 6Police, which may include the fingerprints and must include a 7current photograph of the person, to be updated annually. If 8the sex offender is a child sex offender as defined in Section 911-9.3 or 11-9.4 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 10Code of 2012, he or she shall sign a statement that he or she 11understands that according to Illinois law as a child sex 12offender he or she may not reside within 250 500 feet of a 13school, park, or playground. The offender may also not reside 14within 250 500 feet of a facility providing services directed 15exclusively toward persons under 18 years of age unless the 16sex offender meets specified exemptions. The registration 17information must include whether the person is a sex offender 18as defined in the Sex Offender Community Notification Law. 19Within 3 days, the registering law enforcement agency shall 20forward any required information to the Illinois State Police. 21The registering law enforcement agency shall enter the 22information into the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System 23(LEADS) as provided in Sections 6 and 7 of the 24Intergovernmental Missing Child Recovery Act of 1984.25    (b) DNA submission. Every person registering as a sex 26offender pursuant to this Act, regardless of the date of   SB2254- 33 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1conviction or the date of initial registration who is required 2to submit specimens of blood, saliva, or tissue for DNA 3analysis as required by subsection (a) of Section 5-4-3 of the 4Unified Code of Corrections shall submit the specimens as 5required by that Section. Registered sex offenders who have 6previously submitted a DNA specimen which has been uploaded to 7the Illinois DNA database shall not be required to submit an 8additional specimen pursuant to this Section. 9(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 10    Section 15. The Murderer and Violent Offender Against 11Youth Registration Act is amended by changing Section 10 as 12follows: 13    (730 ILCS 154/10)14    Sec. 10. Duty to register. 15    (a) A violent offender against youth shall, within the 16time period prescribed in subsections (b) and (c), register in 17person and provide accurate information as required by the 18Illinois State Police. Such information shall include a 19current photograph, current address, current place of 20employment, the employer's telephone number, school attended, 21extensions of the time period for registering as provided in 22this Act and, if an extension was granted, the reason why the 23extension was granted and the date the violent offender 24against youth was notified of the extension. A person who has   SB2254- 34 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1been adjudicated a juvenile delinquent for an act which, if 2committed by an adult, would be a violent offense against 3youth shall register as an adult violent offender against 4youth within 10 days after attaining 17 years of age. The 5violent offender against youth shall register: 6        (1) with the chief of police in the municipality in 7    which he or she resides or is temporarily domiciled for a 8    period of time of 5 or more days, unless the municipality 9    is the City of Chicago, in which case he or she shall 10    register at a fixed location designated by the 11    Superintendent of the Chicago Police Department; or 12        (2) with the sheriff in the county in which he or she 13    resides or is temporarily domiciled for a period of time 14    of 5 or more days in an unincorporated area or, if 15    incorporated, no police chief exists. 16    If the violent offender against youth is employed at or 17attends an institution of higher education, he or she shall 18register: 19        (i) with the chief of police in the municipality in 20    which he or she is employed at or attends an institution of 21    higher education, unless the municipality is the City of 22    Chicago, in which case he or she shall register at a fixed 23    location designated by the Superintendent of the Chicago 24    Police Department; or25        (ii) with the sheriff in the county in which he or she 26    is employed or attends an institution of higher education   SB2254- 35 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1    located in an unincorporated area, or if incorporated, no 2    police chief exists. 3    For purposes of this Act, the place of residence or 4temporary domicile is defined as any and all places where the 5violent offender against youth resides for an aggregate period 6of time of 5 or more days during any calendar year. Any person 7required to register under this Act who lacks a fixed address 8or temporary domicile must notify, in person, the agency of 9jurisdiction of his or her last known address within 5 days 10after ceasing to have a fixed residence.11    Any person who lacks a fixed residence must report weekly, 12in person, with the sheriff's office of the county in which he 13or she is located in an unincorporated area, or with the chief 14of police in the municipality in which he or she is located. 15Any person who lacks a fixed residence shall follow the annual 16and interim reporting requirements as provided in the 17applicable Sections of this Act. The agency of jurisdiction 18will document each weekly registration to include all the 19locations where the person has stayed during the past 7 days. 20    The violent offender against youth shall provide accurate 21information as required by the Illinois State Police. That 22information shall include the current place of employment of 23the violent offender against youth. 24    (a-5) An out-of-state student or out-of-state employee 25shall, within 5 days after beginning school or employment in 26this State, register in person and provide accurate   SB2254- 36 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1information as required by the Illinois State Police. Such 2information will include current place of employment, school 3attended, and address in state of residence. The out-of-state 4student or out-of-state employee shall register: 5        (1) with the chief of police in the municipality in 6    which he or she attends school or is employed for a period 7    of time of 5 or more days or for an aggregate period of 8    time of more than 30 days during any calendar year, unless 9    the municipality is the City of Chicago, in which case he 10    or she shall register at a fixed location designated by 11    the Superintendent of the Chicago Police Department; or 12        (2) with the sheriff in the county in which he or she 13    attends school or is employed for a period of time of 5 or 14    more days or for an aggregate period of time of more than 15    30 days during any calendar year in an unincorporated area 16    or, if incorporated, no police chief exists.17    The out-of-state student or out-of-state employee shall 18provide accurate information as required by the Illinois State 19Police. That information shall include the out-of-state 20student's current place of school attendance or the 21out-of-state employee's current place of employment. 22    (b) Any violent offender against youth regardless of any 23initial, prior, or other registration, shall, within 5 days of 24beginning school, or establishing a residence, place of 25employment, or temporary domicile in any county, register in 26person as set forth in subsection (a) or (a-5).   SB2254- 37 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1    (c) The registration for any person required to register 2under this Act shall be as follows: 3        (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this 4    subsection (c), any person who has not been notified of 5    his or her responsibility to register shall be notified by 6    a criminal justice entity of his or her responsibility to 7    register. Upon notification the person must then register 8    within 5 days of notification of his or her requirement to 9    register. If notification is not made within the 10    offender's 10 year registration requirement, and the 11    Illinois State Police determines no evidence exists or 12    indicates the offender attempted to avoid registration, 13    the offender will no longer be required to register under 14    this Act. 15        (2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this 16    subsection (c), any person convicted on or after the 17    effective date of this Act shall register in person within 18    5 days after the entry of the sentencing order based upon 19    his or her conviction. 20        (3) Any person unable to comply with the registration 21    requirements of this Act because he or she is confined, 22    institutionalized, or imprisoned in Illinois on or after 23    the effective date of this Act shall register in person 24    within 5 days of discharge, parole or release. 25        (4) The person shall provide positive identification 26    and documentation that substantiates proof of residence at   SB2254- 38 -LRB104 09439 RLC 22294 b1    the registering address. 2        (5) The person shall pay a $20 initial registration 3    fee and a $10 annual renewal fee. The fees shall be 4    deposited into the Offender Registration Fund. The fees 5    shall be used by the registering agency for official 6    purposes. The agency shall establish procedures to 7    document receipt and use of the funds. The law enforcement 8    agency having jurisdiction may waive the registration fee 9    if it determines that the person is indigent and unable to 10    pay the registration fee. 11    (d) Within 5 days after obtaining or changing employment, 12a person required to register under this Section must report, 13in person to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction, 14the business name and address where he or she is employed. If 15the person has multiple businesses or work locations, every 16business and work location must be reported to the law 17enforcement agency having jurisdiction. 18(Source: P.A. 101-571, eff. 8-23-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.